Washington statutes.
RCW 11.60.030

Hearing.

At the time appointed for such hearing, or at such other time as the same may be adjourned to, upon proof of service of the notice as provided in *RCW 11.16.081, the court shall proceed to a hearing and determine the matter.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.60.030. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 190; RRS s 1560; prior: 1891 c 155 s 42; Code 1881 s 625; 1877 p 130 s 628; 1854 p 293 s 152.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 11.16.081 was repealed by 1969 c 70 s 5.